Utah statutes.
53A-17a-123.5.   Interventions for Student Success Block Grant Program --
State contribution.
(1)  The State Board of Education shall distribute money appropriated for the
Interventions for Student Success Block Grant Program to school districts and
charter schools according to a formula adopted by the board, after
consultation with school districts and charter schools, that allocates the
funding in a fair and equitable manner.
(2)  Schools districts and charter schools shall use Interventions for Student
Success Block Grant money to improve student academic success, with priority
given to interventions on behalf of students not performing to standards as
determined by U-PASS test results.
(3) (a)  Each school district shall develop a plan for the expenditure of
Interventions for Student Success Block Grant money.
(b)  The plan:
(i)  shall specify anticipated results; and
(ii)  may include continuing existing programs to improve students' academic
success for which funds were appropriated before the establishment of the
block grant.
(c)  The local school board shall approve the plan for the expenditure of the
block grant money in an open public meeting before the money are spent.
